zh-TW: 車輛設備改裝等級: 基礎車輛 (無警用改裝); 指揮/通訊改裝; 完整改裝 (燈光; 警犬車改裝 (K-9 改裝); 巡邏就緒 (警示燈與警報器); 預先配線 (僅限電源/開關); 押解就緒 (囚犯隔板/牢籠); 隔板; 無線電底座); 警報器; 其他
es: Nivel de equipamiento del vehículo: Vehículo base (sin equipamiento policial); Estructura de mando/comunicaciones; Equipamiento completo (luces; Estructura K-9; Listo para patrullar (luces y sirena); Precableado (solo alimentación/interruptores); Listo para transporte (división/jaula de prisioneros); división; montaje para radio); sirena; Otro
fr: Niveau d’équipement du véhicule: Véhicule de base (sans équipement de police); Modèle pour commandement/communications; Équipement complet (lumières; Modèle K-9; Prêt pour la patrouille (lumières et sirène); Précâblé (alimentation/interrupteurs uniquement); Prêt pour le transport (cloison/cage pour prisonniers); cloison; support radio); sirène; Autre
th: ระดับการติดตั้งอุปกรณ์ยานพาหนะ: รถยนต์พื้นฐาน (ไม่มีอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับตำรวจ); ชุดควบคุม/การสื่อสาร; อุปกรณ์เสริมครบชุด (ไฟ; ชุด K-9; พร้อมลาดตระเวน (ไฟและไซเรน); เดินสายไฟล่วงหน้า (ไฟ/สวิตช์เท่านั้น); พร้อมขนส่ง (พาร์ทิชัน/กรงผู้ต้องขัง); พาร์ทิชัน; ที่ยึดวิทยุ); ไซเรน; อื่นๆ
sv: Utrustningsnivå för fordon: Grundfordon (ingen polisutrustning); Lednings-/kommunikationsfordon; Full utrustning (ljus; Hundpatrull (K-9); Patrullklar (ljus och siren); Fördragen (endast ström/brytare); Transportklar (skiljevägg/bur för frihetsberövade); skiljevägg; radiofäste); siren; Övrigt
sk-SK: Úroveň vybavenia vozidla: Základné vozidlo (bez policajnej výbavy); Veliteľská/komunikačná výbava; Plná výbava (svetlá,; Výbava K-9; Pripravené na hliadkovanie (svetlá a siréna); Predpripravená kabeláž (iba napájanie/vypínače); Pripravené na prevoz (priehradka/klietka pre väzňov); priehradka; držiak rádia); siréna,; Iné
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės įrangos komplektavimo lygis: Bazinis automobilis (be policijos įrangos); Vadovavimo / ryšių įranga; Pilna įranga (šviesos; K-9 įranga; Paruoštas patruliavimui (šviesos ir sirena); Su iš anksto nutiestais laidais (tik maitinimas / jungikliai); Paruoštas transportavimui (kalinių pertvara / narvas); pertvara; radijo laikiklis); sirena; Kita
hu: Járműfelszerelés felszereltségi szint: Alapjármű (nincs rendőrségi felszerelés); Parancsnoki / Kommunikációs kiépítés; Teljes felszerelés (lámpák; K-9 (kutyás) kiépítés; Járőrkész (lámpák és sziréna); Előkábelezett (csak tápellátás/kapcsolók); Szállításra kész (fogolyelválasztó rács / ketrec); elválasztófal; rádiótartó); sziréna; Egyéb
vi: Mức độ trang bị thiết bị xe: Xe nguyên bản (không lắp thiết bị cảnh sát); Lắp đặt cho chỉ huy/liên lạc; Lắp đặt đầy đủ (đèn; Lắp đặt cho xe K-9; Sẵn sàng tuần tra (đèn và còi hụ); Có sẵn dây (chỉ nguồn/công tắc); Sẵn sàng vận chuyển (vách ngăn/lồng chở phạm nhân); vách ngăn; giá đỡ bộ đàm); còi hụ; Khác
da: Udstyrsniveau for køretøj: Basiskøretøj (ingen politiudrustning); Kommando-/kommunikationsopbygning; Fuld udrustning (lygter; K-9-opbygning; Patruljeklar (lygter og sirene); Forberedt til ledningsnet (kun strøm/kontakter); Transportklar (skillevæg/bur til fanger); skillevæg; radiomontering); sirene; Andet
ja: 車両装備仕様レベル: ベース車両 (警察用装備なし); 指揮/通信用装備; フル装備 (ライト; K-9 仕様; パトロール対応 (ライトおよびサイレン); 配線済み (電源/スイッチのみ); 護送対応 (囚人パーティション/ケージ); パーティション; 無線機マウント); サイレン; その他
pt-BR: Veículo nível de equipagem: Veículo básico (sem adaptação policial); Montagem de comando/comunicações; Adaptação completa (luzes; Montagem K-9; Pronto para patrulha (luzes e sirene); Pré-cabeado (apenas energia/interruptores); Pronto para transporte (divisória/cela para prisioneiros); divisória; suporte para rádio); sirene; Outro
bg-BG: Ниво на оборудване на превозното средство: Базово превозно средство (без полицейско оборудване); Командно/комуникационно оборудване; Пълно оборудване (светлини; Оборудване K-9; Готов за патрулиране (светлини и сирена); Предварително окабелен (само захранване/превключватели); Готов за транспортиране (преграда/клетка за задържани); преграда; стойка за радио); сирена; Друго
it: Livello di allestimento dell'equipaggiamento del veicolo: Veicolo di base (senza allestimento per polizia); Allestimento comando/comunicazioni; Allestimento completo (luci; Allestimento unità cinofila (K-9); Pronto per il pattugliamento (luci e sirena); Precablato (solo alimentazione/interruttori); Pronto per il trasporto (divisorio/gabbia per prigionieri); divisorio; supporto radio); sirena; Altro
cs: Úroveň výbavy vozidla: Základní vozidlo (bez policejní úpravy); Velitelská/komunikační úprava; Kompletní úprava (světla; K-9 úprava; Připraveno na hlídku (světla a siréna); Předpřipravená kabeláž (pouze napájení / vypínače); Připraveno na transport (přepážka/klec pro vězně); přepážka; držák rádia); siréna; Jiné
el: Επίπεδο διαμόρφωσης εξοπλισμού οχήματος: Βασικό όχημα (χωρίς αστυνομικό εξοπλισμό); Διαμόρφωση διοίκησης/επικοινωνιών; Πλήρης εξοπλισμός (φώτα; Διαμόρφωση K-9; Έτοιμο για περιπολία (φώτα και σειρήνα); Προ-καλωδιωμένο (μόνο τροφοδοσία/διακόπτες); Έτοιμο για μεταφορά (διαχωριστικό/κλουβί κρατουμένων); διαχωριστικό; βάση ασυρμάτου); σειρήνα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Razina opremljenosti vozila: Osnovno vozilo (bez policijske opreme); Komandno/komunikacijsko vozilo; Potpuna oprema (svjetla; Opremljeno za službene pse (K-9); Spremno za patrolu (svjetla i sirena); S ugrađenim ožičenjem (samo napajanje/prekidači); Spremno za transport (pregrada/kavez za zatvorenike); pregrada; nosač za radio); sirena; Ostalo
pl: Poziom wyposażenia pojazdu: Pojazd bazowy (bez wyposażenia policyjnego); Wersja dowodzenia/łączności; Pełne wyposażenie (światła; Wersja K-9 (dla psów); Gotowy do patrolu (światła i syrena); Wstępnie okablowany (tylko zasilanie/przełączniki); Gotowy do transportu (przegroda/klatka dla więźniów); przegroda; mocowanie radia); syrena; Inne
pt-PT: Nível de equipamento/adaptação do veículo: Veículo base (sem equipamento policial); Construção para comando/comunicações; Equipamento completo (luzes; Construção K-9; Pronto para patrulha (luzes e sirene); Pré-cablado (apenas energia/interruptores); Pronto para transporte (divisória/gaiola para prisioneiros); divisória; suporte de rádio); sirene; Outro
tr: Araç ekipman donanım seviyesi: Temel araç (polis donanımı yok); Komuta/iletişim donanımı; Tam donanım (ışıklar; K-9 donanımı; Devriyeye hazır (ışıklar ve siren); Önceden kablolanmış (sadece güç/anahtarlar); Taşımaya hazır (mahkum bölmesi/kafesi); bölme; telsiz montajı); siren; Diğer
de: Ausstattungsgrad des Fahrzeugs: Basisfahrzeug (ohne Polizei-Ausstattung); Befehls-/Kommunikationsausbau; Vollausstattung (Lichter; K-9-Ausbau; Patrouillenbereit (Lichter & Sirene); Vorverkabelt (nur Strom/Schalter); Transportbereit (Gefangenentrennwand/-käfig); Trennwand; Funkgerätehalterung); Sirene; Sonstiges
nl: Voertuig uitrustingsinbouwniveau: Basisvoertuig (geen politie-uitrusting); Commando-/communicatie-uitrusting; Volledige uitrusting (verlichting; K-9-uitrusting; Klaar voor patrouille (verlichting en sirene); Vooraf bedraad (alleen stroom/schakelaars); Klaar voor transport (gevangenenscheidingswand/-kooi); scheidingswand; radiomontage); sirene; Overig
ro-RO: Nivelul de echipare a vehiculului: Vehicul de bază (fără echipare de poliție); Echipare pentru comandă/comunicații; Echipare completă (lumini; Echipare K-9; Gata de patrulare (lumini și sirenă); Precablare (doar alimentare/întrerupătoare); Gata de transport (perete despărțitor/cușcă pentru deținuți); perete despărțitor; suport radio); sirenă; Altele
nb: Innredningsnivå for kjøretøyutstyr: Grunnbil (ingen politiutrustning); Kommando-/kommunikasjonsutrustning; Full utrustning (lys; Hundeførerutrustning; Patruljeklar (lys og sirene); Forhåndskablet (kun strøm/brytere); Transportklar (fangegitter/-bur); skillevegg; radiomontering); sirene; Annet
ru: Уровень оснащения транспортного средства: Базовый автомобиль (без полицейского оснащения); Командно-штабное/связное оснащение; Полное оснащение (проблесковые маячки; Оснащение К-9 (для собак); Готовность к патрулированию (проблесковые маячки и сирена); С предварительной проводкой (только питание/переключатели); Готовность к транспортировке (перегородка/клетка для задержанных); перегородка; крепление для рации); сирена; Другое
ko: 차량 장비 개조 수준: 기본 차량(경찰 개조 없음); 지휘/통신 차량 설계; 전체 개조(조명; K-9 설계; 순찰용(조명 및 사이렌); 사전 배선(전원/스위치 전용); 호송용(수감자 파티션/케이지); 파티션; 무전기 거치대); 사이렌; 기타
en: Vehicle equipment fit-out level: Base vehicle (no police upfit); Command/communications build; Full upfit (lights; K-9 build; Patrol ready (lights & siren); Pre-wired (power/switches only); Transport ready (prisoner partition/cage); partition; radio mount); siren; Other
fi: Ajoneuvon varustetaso: Perusajoneuvo (ei poliisivarustelua); Johto-/viestintävarustelu; Täysi varustelu (valot; Koirapoliisivarustelu; Partiointivalmis (valot ja sireeni); Esijohdotettu (vain virta/kytkimet); Kuljetusvalmis (vankiväliseinä/-häkki); väliseinä; radioteline); sireeni; Muu
sl-SI: Raven opremljenosti vozila: Osnovno vozilo (brez policijske opreme); Komunikacijsko/poveljniško vozilo; Popolna oprema (luči; K-9 vozilo; Pripravljeno na patruljiranje (luči in sirena); Predhodno ožičeno (samo napajanje/stikala); Pripravljeno na transport (pregrada/kletka za zapornike); pregrada; nosilec za radio); sirena; Drugo
zh-CN: 车辆装备改装等级: 基础车辆 (无警用改装); 指挥/通信改装; 全面改装 (车灯; 警犬车改装; 巡逻就绪 (车灯和警报器); 预接线 (仅电源/开关); 运输就绪 (囚犯隔板/牢笼); 隔板; 对讲机支架); 警报器; 其他